California statutes. Public Utilities Code
Unless otherwise provided in this division, petitions made pursuant to this article, in the matter of form, signatures, and preparation, and the proceedings based upon them, in the matter of calling and conducting an election, the manner of voting, cavassing the return, and declaring the result shall conform as nearly as practicable to the provisions of general law relating to direct legislation or the referendum by cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Other Officers [16111. - 16116.]

16111.

The officers of the district, other than the board of directors, are:

(a) A clerk, who is also ex officio secretary of the board.

(b) An accountant.

(c) A treasurer.

(d) A general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16112.

The officers, other than the board of directors, shall be appointed by the board, hold office at its pleasure, and receive such compensation as is provided for by the board by ordinance. They, or any of them, shall give such bond as is prescribed by the board. They shall perform such duties as are provided by this division, and such further duties as are imposed upon them by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16113.

When the district acquires, constructs, owns, or operates two or more public utilities, a general manager may be appointed and employed for each public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16114.

Subject to such restrictions as the board may impose, the general manager shall have full charge and control of the construction of the works of the district and of their maintenance and operation. He shall report to the board in accordance with such rules and regulations as it may adopt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16115.

The clerk shall countersign all contracts on behalf of the district. He shall give his full time during office hours to the affairs of the district. He is ex officio secretary of the board and shall keep a record of its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16116.

The accountant shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting which completely and at all times shows the financial condition of the district. He shall draw all warrants to pay demands made against the district when the demands have been first approved by a majority of the board present at the meeting at which the demands are acted upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. District Elections [16151. - 16165.]

16151.

The biennial election for the election of directors shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of odd-numbered years. This election is the general district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

16152.

Except as otherwise provided in this division, districts governed by this division are subject to the provisions of the Uniform District Election Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

16153.

No person may vote at any district election unless he possesses all the requirements of an elector under the general laws and is a qualified elector residing within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16160.

If land is annexed to a district, the board shall reestablish the boundaries of the units and election precincts within the district not less than 90 days before any election in the district. The reestablished boundaries shall include the annexed land in the same manner and with the same effect as set forth in Sections 15953 to 15964, inclusive. If land is annexed less than 90 days before an election within the district, the inhabitants of the land included shall not vote at the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1966, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

16162.

Whenever a special election is called pursuant to Articles 1 or 2 of Chapter 5 for the purpose of submitting to the electors a proposition, the board shall pass an ordinance calling the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16163.

At the special election all propositions formulated pursuant to Articles 1 or 2 of Chapter 5 may be submitted to the electors of the district, but no question other than such propositions shall be submitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16164.

The ordinance calling the election shall set forth the following:

(a) The purposes for which it is called.

(b) The estimated cost of each utility or utility works proposed for acquisition, construction, or completion by the district.

(c) The proposed method and manner of payment.

(d) The day on which the election will be held.

(e) The manner of holding the election.

(f) The manner of voting for or against each proposition submitted to the electors.

(g) If it is necessary to incur a district indebtedness for any utility or public utility works therein proposed, the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, and that bonds of the district shall issue for the payment of the cost of such utility or public utility works, if the proposition is accepted by the electors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16165.

The election shall be held as provided for holding elections in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Employees [16191. - 16196.]

16191.

The maximum time of labor or service required of any laborer, workman, or mechanic employed upon any work of the district, whether employed directly by the district and its officers, or by a contractor or subcontractor, shall be eight hours during any one calendar day, except in case of emergency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16192.

The board shall fix the hours of labor or service required of all employees of the district, and their compensation, and shall employ all necessary employees or may by ordinance provide for their employment by the several officers of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16193.

The board shall classify all places of employment under the district and its offices and departments, with reference to the examinations provided by this article, except as provided in Section 16196. The places classified by the board are the classified civil service of the district, and appointments to civil service places shall be made according to the rules provided by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16194.

The board shall make rules to effect a civil service system, and for examinations, appointments, promotions, and removals, and from time to time may make changes in existing rules. All rules and all changes shall be forthwith printed for distribution by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16195.

Examinations shall be practical, and shall relate to those matters only which will fairly test the relative capacity of the persons examined to discharge the duties of the positions which they seek, and shall include, when appropriate, tests of manual or professional skill. The selection of laborers shall be governed by priority of application as far as practicable. No question in any examination shall relate to political or religious opinions or affiliations. The board shall control all examinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16196.

The manager, engineer, clerk, accountant, and treasurer shall not be included within the classified civil service of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions of Districts [16401. - 16682.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Powers [16401. - 16409.]

16401.

A district has perpetual succession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16402.

Except as otherwise provided, a district may sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16402.5.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any judicial action or proceeding against a district that provides electric utility service, to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul an ordinance, resolution, or motion fixing or changing a rate or charge for an electric commodity or an electric service furnished by a district and adopted on or after July 1, 2000, shall be commenced within 120 days of the effective date of that ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(b) This section does not apply to any judicial action or proceeding filed pursuant to Chapter 13.7 (commencing with Section 54999) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code to protest or challenge a rate or charge or to seek the refund of a capital facilities fee if the notice and disclosure requirements of Section 54999.35 of the Government Code have not been followed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 146, Sec. 7.   Effective July 21, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

16403.

A district may adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16404.

A district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

16407.

A district has the same powers with reference to improvement districts as are conferred upon irrigation districts by Division 11, Part 7 of the Water Code and as are conferred upon municipal water districts by Part 7 (commencing with Section 71851) and Part 8 (commencing with Section 72000) of Division 20 of the Water Code. As used in this section, all references to districts in the adopted acts shall refer to public utility districts and all words relating to irrigation or municipal water district officers and matters refer to the corresponding officers of a public utility district and matters under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 661.)
-------------------------------------------

16408.

Improvement districts also may be formed of land proposed to be annexed to the district, contingent upon the annexation being completed. The petition for annexation may request that the land to be annexed shall be included in and form a part of any improvement district existing within the district or shall constitute a new improvement district within the district when annexed or the board of directors of the district may determine, as one of the terms and conditions for the annexation, that the land shall be included in and form a part of any improvement district then existing within the district or shall constitute a new improvement district when annexed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16409.

For the purpose of obtaining and supplying water for domestic, irrigation, and fire protection purposes, a district may cooperate and contract with the United States and borrow or procure money from the United States in the same manner and under the same procedures as irrigation districts under Division 11, Part 6, Chapter 2 of the Water Code. Any district, in order to make payments to the United States under any contract between the district and the United States, may, in lieu, in whole or in part of levying assessments, fix and collect charges for the service of water by the district to any land. A district may charge higher rates for service of water to any landowner in the amount required to pay any interest costs charged to the district on any United States Bureau of Reclamation loan by reason of land held by such owner in excess of 160 acres.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 388.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Property [16431. - 16432.]

16431.

A district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, or otherwise acquire, hold and enjoy, and lease or dispose of, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district, when in the judgment of the board it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16432.

The legal title to all property acquired under this division vests immediately and by operation of law in the district, and is held by the district in trust, and is dedicated and set apart to the uses and purposes set forth in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Utility Works and Services [16461. - 16489.]

16461.

A district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control, or use, within or without or partly within and partly without the district, works for supplying its inhabitants with light, water, power, heat, transportation, telephone service, or other means of communication, or means for the disposition of garbage, sewage, or refuse matter, and may do all things necessary or convenient to the full exercise of the powers granted in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 133.)
-------------------------------------------

16461.5.

(a) The Shasta Dam Area Public Utility District may construct those public works necessary for the industrial and commercial development of any undeveloped property owned by the district prior to January 12, 1990. A decision by the Shasta Dam Area Public Utility District to construct public works pursuant to this section is a legislative act subject to referendum pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 9340) of Chapter 4 of Division 9 of the Elections Code. The improvements shall comply with all of the ordinances, resolutions,
 policies, and other standards of the city or county in which the property is located, and comply with all state laws governing public works and public agencies.

(b) Any contract awarded by the Shasta Dam Area Public Utility District pursuant to this section shall be considered a public works project subject to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(c) None of the costs for public works constructed pursuant to this section shall be borne by Shasta Dam Area Public Utility District customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 187.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

16461.10.

A district that provides broadband Internet access services shall comply with the requirements of Article 12 (commencing with Section 53167) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 963, Sec. 8.   (AB 1999)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16462.

A district may also purchase any of such commodities or services from any other utility district, municipality, person, or private company, and distribute them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16463.

A district may acquire, construct, own, complete, use, and operate a fire department, street lighting system, public parks, public playgrounds, golf courses, public swimming pools, public recreation buildings, buildings to be used for public purposes, and works to provide for the drainage of roads, streets, and public places, including, but not limited to, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, and pavement of streets. For purposes of this division, all of those projects shall be considered a public utility or public utility works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 134.)
-------------------------------------------

16463.5.

(a) A district may exercise any of the powers, functions, and duties which are vested in, or imposed upon, a fire protection district pursuant to the Fire Protection District Law of 1987, Part 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) If the district includes any part of a local agency which provides fire protection service to any territory in the district, the district shall have no authority regarding the prevention and suppression of fires in that territory, unless the district has obtained the consent of the local
 agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1013, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

16464.

A district may construct works across or along any street or public highway, or over any land which is the property of the state, and has the same rights and privileges appertaining thereto as are granted to cities within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 135.)
-------------------------------------------

16465.

A district may construct its works across any stream of water or watercourse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

16466.

A district using a street or highway shall restore it to its former state as nearly as possible and shall not unnecessarily impair its usefulness.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

16467.

Only revenue producing utilities shall be acquired, owned, or operated by a district. So far as possible the board shall fix such charges for commodities or service furnished by any revenue producing utility as will pay all of the expenses of the government of the district, or such portion as the board determines justly apportionable to such utility. The expenses to be paid include:

(a) Salaries, office expenses, and other necessary disbursements.

(b) The operating expenses of the utility.

(c) The interest on any indebtedness incurred for the acquisition, construction, and completion of the utility.

(d) Provisions for a sinking or other appropriate fund for the payment of the principal of such debt as it becomes due.

(e) Provisions for an appropriate fund for repairs, replacements, and betterments.

It is the intention of this section that a district pay all of such charges and expenditures and the interest and principal of its debt from the revenues derived by the district from the operation of its public utilities, and that each public utility owned and operated by a district shall be self-sustaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16467.1.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16467 of this code, fire departments, street lighting systems, public parks, public playgrounds, public swimming pools, public recreation buildings, buildings used for a public purpose, and works to provide for the drainage of roads, streets, and public places, including, but not limited to, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, and pavement of streets need not be operated on a self-sustaining, revenue-producing basis. Revenue to defray the cost of acquiring, constructing, installing, maintaining, improving, and operating such utilities and to pay the principal and interest and to create reserve and sinking funds on any indebtedness incurred
 in connection therewith, may be raised in any manner authorized by this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 226.)
-------------------------------------------

16468.

Charges fixed by the board for commodities or services furnished may be made payable in advance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16469.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), charges unpaid at the time specified for the fixing of the rate of taxes may be added to and become part of the annual assessment levied upon the land upon which the commodity or service was used if the property is owned, controlled, or in the possession of the same person who owned, controlled, or was in possession of it during the time the service charges were incurred or if the only transfers made of the property since the date the charges were incurred have been transfers by gift, descent, bequest, or devise.

(b) No district
 furnishing water for residential use to a tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties for the furnishing of water to or for the tenant’s residential use from any subsequent tenant on account of nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. The district may, however, require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1251, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

16470.

Charges added to an assessment are a lien on the land, except that if, during the year preceding the date on which the first installment of real property taxes which evidence the charges appears on the roll, any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for value has been created and attaches thereon, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such property and the district shall within three years after the amount is due file for record in the office of any county recorder a certificate specifying the
 amount, interest, and penalty due, the name and address as it appears on the records of the district of the person liable for the same, and the fact that the district has complied with all provisions of this part in the determination of the amount required to be paid. From the time of recordation of the certificate, the amount required to be paid together with interest and penalty constitutes a lien upon all real property in the county owned by the person or afterwards and before the lien expires acquired by him. The lien has the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the time of the filing of the certificate unless sooner released or otherwise discharged. The lien may, within 10 years from the date of the filing of the certificate or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner herein provided, be extended by filing for record a new certificate in the office of the county recorder of any county and from the time of such filing the
 lien shall be extended to the real property in such county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1137, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

16471.

If the assessment is divided and made payable in two installments, the unpaid charges may be added to and become a part of the first installment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16472.

When the board declares that charges are to be added to the annual assessment and the district is availing itself of assessments made by the assessor of any county in which the district is situated, the board shall include in the statement of the tax rate to be transmitted to the county auditor the amount of each of the charges to be levied, and the auditor shall make the charges a part of the assessment in accordance with the statement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16472.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 16469 to 16472, inclusive, and as an alternative to the procedures specified in those sections, a district may provide by resolution or ordinance that delinquent water charges and interest and penalties thereon constitute a lien on the real property served to the extent that the property is owned by the person or entity receiving the service, when a certificate is recorded pursuant to this section, which shall continue in effect until the amount of charges, interest, and penalties are paid or the property is sold to satisfy the charges, interest, and penalties. No lien may be created under this section on
 any publicly owned property.

(b) A lien pursuant to this section attaches when the district files for record in the office of the county recorder a certificate specifying the amount of charges, interest, and penalties due; the name of the owner of record of the property who received the water service; the legal description of the property served; and the fact that the district has complied with all provisions of this part in the determination of the charges, interest, and penalties due. From the time of recordation of the certificate, the charges, interest, and penalties constitute a lien on the property. Within 30 days of receipt of payment of all costs specified in subdivision (a), or within 30 days of a demand by an escrow agent in the event of a voluntary sale, the district shall record in the office of the county recorder a release of the lien created by this section.

(c) The
 county recorder shall charge the district the fees specified in Sections 27361 and 27361.4 of the Government Code for recording any certificate pursuant to subdivision (b), which certificate shall be indexed to the name of the property owner as grantor and the district as grantee.

(d) This section is in addition to any other remedies available to a district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1217, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

16472.5.

(a) In order to enforce the provisions of any ordinance of the district, including an ordinance fixing charges for the furnishing of commodities or services, the district may correct any violation of an ordinance of the district. The district may also petition the superior court for the issuance of a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, as may be appropriate, restraining any person from the continued violation of any ordinance of the district or for the issuance of an order stopping or disconnecting a service if the charges for that
 service are unpaid at the time specified in the ordinance.

(b) The district may enter upon the private property of any person within the jurisdiction of the district in order to investigate possible violations of an ordinance of the district. The investigation shall be made with the consent of the owner or tenant of the property or, if consent is refused, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedures set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that, notwithstanding Section 1822.52 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the warrant shall be issued only upon probable cause.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 798, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16473.

Whenever there is a surplus of available water, light, heat, or power above that which is required by the inhabitants or municipalities within the district, the district may sell or otherwise dispose of such surplus outside of the district to persons, firms, and public or private corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16474.

Whenever any of the facilities, works, or utilities of all or part of a district is not used or employed to its fullest capacity for the benefit or requirements of the district or its inhabitants, the district may employ such surplus facilities to supply any of its public utility services outside the boundaries of the district upon such terms and conditions and under such agreement as its board determines is for the best interests of the district. Any public utility service supplied by a district outside its boundaries shall not exceed in amount the same type of public utility service supplied by the district within its boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

16475.

(a) A public utility district which acquires, constructs, owns, operates, controls or uses works for supplying its inhabitants with water, may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix and collect a water standby or immediate availability charge on all land within its boundaries to which water is made available for any purpose by the district, whether the water is actually used or not, except that such charge shall not supply to lands permanently dedicated exclusively to
 transportation of persons or property. If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the district’s board of directors may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this section in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(b) The board of directors of the district which fixes such a charge may establish schedules varying the charges in different months and in different localities within a public utility district depending upon factors such as the uses to which the land is put, the cost of transporting the water to the land, the degree of availability or quantity of use of such water to the affected lands. The board may not, however, fix an annual charge in excess of ten dollars ($10) per acre or in excess
 of five dollars ($5) for parcel of less than one acre, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(c) If a person for more than one year obtains substantially all of his or her water requirements for the contiguous parcels of land which he or she occupies from rainfall, springs, streams, lakes, rivers, or wells, and if the person’s primary economic activity on such land is the commercial extraction or processing of minerals, such land shall be exempt from any water standby or availability charges.

(d) Any funds derived from the charges levied pursuant to this section may be used by the district for all purposes which a public utility district is authorized to expend funds insofar as said purposes relate to the acquisition,
 construction, operation, control, or use of works for supplying its inhabitants with water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16476.1.

(a) The Tahoe City Public Utility District may acquire, construct, install, maintain, improve, or operate public walkways, paths, sidewalks, trails, and public parking facilities if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The district board of directors passes an ordinance pursuant to Sections 16072 to 16084, inclusive, authorizing the district to exercise these powers.

(2) The Board of Supervisors of Placer
 County adopts a resolution authorizing the district to exercise these powers.

(3) The improvements comply with all of the ordinances, resolutions, policies, and other standards of the city or county in which the property is located, and comply with all state laws governing public works and public agencies.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 16467, the services, facilities, or installations or operation thereof provided for in subdivision (a) need not be financed on a revenue-producing basis. Revenue to defray the cost of constructing, installing, maintaining, and operating the facilities or services or to pay the principal and interest and to create reserve and sinking funds on any indebtedness incurred in connection therewith, may be raised in any manner authorized by this division.

(c) Assessments levied to pay for the
 acquisition, construction, installation, maintenance, improvement, or operation of public walkways, paths, sidewalks, trails, and public parking facilities pursuant to this section shall be subject to approval by a majority vote of the property owners of the assessment district in which the services, facilities, or installations are located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16477.

Notwithstanding Section 16475, the Board of Directors of the Fallbrook Public Utility District may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix and collect an annual water standby or immediate availability charge. The standby or immediate availability charge shall not exceed thirty dollars ($30) per acre or any parcel of less than one acre, unless the standby or immediate availability charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part
 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this section, applicable only to the Fallbrook Public Utility District, is necessary because of the unique and special water management problems within that district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16478.

The Board of Directors of the Tahoe City Public Utility District, the Board of Directors of the South Tahoe Public Utility District, and the Board of Directors of the North Tahoe Public Utility District shall each have the authority to fix and collect an annual standby charge for sewage service on all lands within the district under its jurisdiction, in such amount as the board shall specify, provided that such standby charge for sewage service shall not exceed ten dollars ($10) per acre for parcels in excess of one acre or twenty dollars ($20) per parcel for
 parcels less than one acre, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

The standby charge authorized by this section shall be imposed only pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code. If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, that charge pursuant to this section may be levied at the same rate in subsequent years without the requirement of a hearing, provided that if new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board of directors shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this section, applicable only to the Tahoe City Public Utility
 District, the South Tahoe Public Utility District, and the North Tahoe Public Utility District is necessary because of the unique and special water management, pollution, and sewage disposal problems of the Lake Tahoe Basin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

16479.

If the Board of Directors of the Tahoe City Public Utility District or of the North Tahoe Public Utility District determines to use all or any portion of a surplus remaining in the improvement fund from any assessment proceeding to improve the sewer system within district’s jurisdiction in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 10427 of the Streets and Highways Code, all of the surpluses to be used for the maintenance of the improvements may be transferred by the legislative body to a single fund for the maintenance and operation of the sewer system without regard to the proportion of the funds so created attributable to each
 proceeding from which the surplus arose.

The board of directors shall transfer to such single fund the same percentage of the surplus from each improvement fund. The fact that in one or more of such improvement funds no surplus exists shall not prevent the board of directors from proceeding pursuant to this section as to all improvement funds in which a surplus does exist if a surplus of no less than 212 percent of the total cost exists in no less than 75 percent of such funds.

This section, applicable only to the Tahoe City Public Utility District and the North Tahoe Public Utility District, is necessary because of unique and special fiscal management problems of improvement districts in the Lake Tahoe Basin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 334, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

16480.

(a) Every district furnishing light, heat, or power shall expend no funds for advertising when such advertising encourages increased consumption of such services or commodities.

(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a district furnishing light, heat, or power from expending funds for advertising which encourages the more efficient operation of the facilities, works, or utilities of the district, or for advertising which encourages the more efficient use of light, heat, or power, the conservation of energy or natural resources, or presents accurate information on the economical purchase,
 maintenance, or use of any appliance or device using light, heat, or power.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 16477 (as added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 194) by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

16480.5.

Whenever a business transaction of a public utility district furnishing electricity, gas, water service where the utility has 10,000 or more service connections, or telephone service is such that a personal appearance by a person is required by the district and the person is unable to appear at the district’s place of business during the district’s usual business hours, then the district shall provide a reasonable and convenient alternative to the person such as an appointment outside the district’s usual business hours or allowing the person to conduct the
 transaction by telephone, mail, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 614, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16481.

(a) This section applies if there is a landlord-tenant relationship between the residential occupants and the owner, manager, or operator of the dwelling.

(b) If a district furnishes individually metered residential light, heat, water, or power to residential occupants in a detached single-family dwelling, multiunit residential structure,
 mobilehome park, or permanent residential structure in a labor camp, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, and the owner, manager, or operator is the customer of record, the district shall make every good faith effort to inform the residential occupants, by means of written notice, when the account is in arrears, that service will be terminated in 10 days. The written notice shall further inform the residential occupants that they have the right to become customers of the district without being required to pay the amount due on the delinquent account. The notice shall be in English and in the languages listed in Section 1632 of the Civil Code.
